Vermont, session 2025-2026, S74.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. chapter 42B is amended to read:
42B. HEALTH CARE PRIVACY
Subchapter 1. Disclosure of Protected Health Information
§ 1881. DISCLOSURE OF PROTECTED HEALTH INFORMATION
PROHIBITED
* * *
Subchapter 2. Vermont My Health My Data Act
§ 1891a. SHORT TITLE
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Vermont My
Health My Data Act.”
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 2 of 30
§ 1891b. FINDINGS AND INTENT
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The residents of Vermont regard their privacy as a fundamental right
and an essential element of their individual freedom. Fundamental privacy
rights have long been and continue to be integral to protecting Vermonters and
to safeguarding our democratic republic.
(2) Information related to an individual’s health conditions or attempts
to obtain health care services is among the most personal and sensitive
categories of data collected. Vermonters expect that their health data is
protected under laws like the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996 (HIPAA). However, HIPAA only covers health data collected by
specific health care entities, including most health care providers. Health data
collected by noncovered entities, including certain applications and websites,
are not afforded the same protections. This act works to close the gap between
consumer knowledge and industry practice by providing stronger privacy
protections for all of Vermont consumers’ health data.
(b) Intent. By enacting this subchapter, it is the intent of the General
Assembly to provide heightened protections for Vermonters’ health data by:
(1) requiring additional disclosures and consumer consent regarding the
collection, sharing, and use of their health data;
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 3 of 30
(2) empowering consumers with the right to have their health data
deleted;
(3) prohibiting the selling of consumer health data without valid
authorization signed by the consumer; and
(4) making it unlawful to utilize a geofence around a facility that
provides health care services.
§ 1891c. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Abortion” means any medical treatment intended to induce the
termination of, or to terminate, a clinically diagnosable pregnancy except for
the purpose of producing a live birth.
(2) “Affiliate” means a legal entity that shares common branding with
another legal entity and controls, is controlled by, or is under common control
with another legal entity. For purposes of this definition, “control” or
“controlled” means any one or more of the following:
(A) ownership of, or the power to vote, more than 50 percent of the
outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a company;
(B) control in any manner over the election of a majority of the
directors or of individuals exercising similar functions; or
(C) the power to exercise controlling influence over the management
of a company.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 4 of 30
(3) “Area agency on aging” has the same meaning as in 33 V.S.A.
§ 6203.
(4) “Authenticate” means to use reasonable means to determine that a
request to exercise any of the rights afforded in this chapter is being made by
or on behalf of the consumer who is entitled to exercise those consumer rights
with respect to the consumer health data at issue.
(5) “Biometric data” means data that is generated from the measurement
or technological processing of an individual’s physiological, biological, or
behavioral characteristics and that identifies a consumer, whether individually
or in combination with other data. Biometric data includes:
(A) imagery of the iris, retina, fingerprint, face, hand, palm, vein
patterns, and voice recordings, from which an identifier template can be
extracted; and
(B) keystroke patterns or rhythms and gait patterns or rhythms that
contain identifying information.
(6) “Collect” means to buy, rent, access, retain, receive, acquire, infer,
derive, or otherwise process consumer health data in any manner.
(7)(A) “Consent” means a clear affirmative act that signifies the
consumer’s freely given, specific, informed, opt-in, voluntary, and
unambiguous agreement, which may include written consent provided by
electronic means.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 5 of 30
(B) “Consent” shall not be obtained by:
(i) a consumer’s acceptance of a general or broad terms-of-use
agreement or a similar document that contains descriptions of personal data
processing along with other unrelated information;
(ii) a consumer hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given
piece of content; or
(iii) a consumer’s agreement obtained through the use of deceptive
designs.
(8)(A) “Consumer” means a natural person who meets one or both of
the following conditions:
(i) the person is a Vermont resident; or
(ii) the person’s consumer health data is collected in Vermont.
(B) “Consumer” means a natural person who acts only in an
individual or household context, however identified, including by any unique
identifier. The term does not include an individual acting in an employment
context.
(9)(A) “Consumer health data” means personal information that is
linked or reasonably linkable to a consumer and that identifies the consumer’s
past, present, or future physical or mental health status.
(B) For purposes of this definition, physical or mental health status
includes:
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 6 of 30
(i) individual health conditions, treatment diseases, or diagnosis;
(ii) social, psychological, behavioral, and medical interventions;
(iii) health-related surgeries or procedures;
(iv) use or purchase of prescribed medication;
(v) bodily functions, vital signs, symptoms, or measurements of
the information described in this subdivision (B);
(vi) diagnoses or diagnostic testing, treatment, or medication;
(vii) gender-affirming care information;
(viii) reproductive or sexual health information;
(ix) biometric data;
(x) genetic data;
(xi) precise location information that could reasonably indicate a
consumer’s attempt to acquire or receive health services or supplies;
(xii) data that identifies a consumer seeking health care services;
or
(xiii) any information that a regulated entity or a small business,
or its respective processor, processes to associate or identify a consumer with
the data described in subdivisions (i)–(xii) of this subdivision (B) that is
derived or extrapolated from nonhealth information, such as proxy, derivative,
inferred, or emergency data by any means, including algorithms or machine
learning.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 7 of 30
(C) “Consumer health data” does not include personal information
that is used to engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or
statistical research in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable
ethics and privacy laws and is approved, monitored, and governed by an
institutional review board, human subjects research ethics review board, or a
similar independent oversight entity that determines that the regulated entity or
the small business has implemented reasonable safeguards to mitigate privacy
risks associated with research, including any risks associated with
reidentification.
(10) “Deceptive design” means a user interface designed or manipulated
with the effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision making, or
choice.
(11) “Deidentified data” means data that cannot reasonably be used to
infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, an identified or identifiable
consumer, or a device linked to such consumer, if the regulated entity or the
small business that possesses the data does all of the following:
(A) takes reasonable measures to ensure that the data cannot be
associated with a consumer;
(B) publicly commits to process the data only in a deidentified
fashion and not to attempt to reidentify the data; and
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 8 of 30
(C) contractually obligates any recipients of the data to satisfy the
criteria set forth in this subdivision (11).
(12) “Gender-affirming care information” means personal information
relating to seeking or obtaining past, present, or future gender-affirming health
care services. “Gender-affirming care information” includes:
(A) precise location information that could reasonably indicate a
consumer’s attempt to acquire or receive gender-affirming health care services;
(B) efforts to research or obtain gender-affirming health care
services; or
(C) any gender-affirming care information that is derived,
extrapolated, or inferred, including from nonhealth information such as proxy,
derivative, inferred, emergent, or algorithmic data.
(13) “Gender-affirming health care services” has the same meaning as in
1 V.S.A. § 150.
(14) “Genetic data” means any data, regardless of its format, that
concerns a consumer’s genetic characteristics. “Genetic data” includes:
(A) raw sequence data that result from the sequencing of a
consumer’s complete extracted deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) or a portion of
the extracted DNA;
(B) genotypic and phenotypic information that results from analyzing
the raw sequence data; and
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 9 of 30
(C) self-reported health data that a consumer submits to a regulated
entity or a small business and that is analyzed in connection with the
consumer’s raw sequence data.
(15) “Geofence” means technology that uses global positioning
coordinates, cell tower connectivity, cellular data, radio frequency
identification, Wi-Fi data, or any other form of spatial or location detection,
individually or in combination, to establish a virtual boundary around a
specific physical location or to locate a consumer within a virtual boundary.
(16) “Health care service” means any service provided to a person to
assess, measure, improve, or learn about a person’s mental or physical health,
including:
(A) individual health conditions, status, diseases, or diagnoses;
(B) social, psychological, behavioral, and medical interventions;
(C) health-related surgeries or procedures;
(D) use or purchase of medication;
(E) bodily functions, vital signs, symptoms, or measurements of the
information described in this subdivision (16);
(F) diagnoses or diagnostic testing, treatment, or medication;
(G) reproductive health services; or
(H) gender-affirming health care services.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 10 of 30
(17) “Homepage” means the introductory page of an internet website
and any internet web page on which personal information is collected. In the
case of an online service such as a mobile application, “homepage” means the
application’s platform page or download page, and a link within the
application, such as from the application configuration or the “about,”
“information,” or “settings” page.
(18) “Person” means, where applicable, a natural person, corporation,
trust, unincorporated association, or partnership. The term does not include a
government agency, tribal nation, or a contracted service provider when
processing consumer health data on behalf of a government agency.
(19)(A) “Personal information” means information that identifies or is
reasonably capable of being associated or linked, directly or indirectly, with a
particular consumer. “Personal information” includes data associated with a
persistent unique identifier, such as a cookie ID, an IP address, a device
identifier, or any other form of persistent unique identifier.
(B) “Personal information” does not include publicly available
information or deidentified data.
(20) “Precise location information” means information derived from
technology, including global positioning system level latitude and longitude
coordinates and other mechanisms, that directly identifies the specific location
of an individual with precision and accuracy within a radius of 1,850 feet.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 11 of 30
“Precise location information” does not include the content of communications
or any data generated by or connected to advanced utility metering
infrastructure systems or equipment for use by a utility.
(21) “Process” or “processing” means any operation or set of operations
performed on consumer health data.
(22) “Processor” means a person who processes consumer health data
on behalf of a regulated entity or a small business.
(23)(A) “Publicly available information” means information that:
(i) is lawfully made available through federal, state, or municipal
government records or widely distributed media; and
(ii) a regulated entity or a small business has a reasonable basis to
believe a consumer has lawfully made available to the general public.
(B) “Publicly available information” does not include any biometric
data collected about a consumer by a business without the consumer’s consent.
(24)(A) “Regulated entity” means any legal entity that:
(i) conducts business in Vermont, or produces or provides
products or services that are targeted to consumers in Vermont; and
(ii) alone or jointly with others, determines the purpose and means
of collecting, processing, sharing, or selling of consumer health data.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 12 of 30
(B) “Regulated entity” does not mean government agencies or
contracted service providers when processing consumer health data on behalf
of a government agency.
(25)(A) “Reproductive or sexual health information” means personal
information relating to seeking or obtaining past, present, or future
reproductive or sexual health services.
(B) “Reproductive or sexual health information” includes:
(i) precise location information that could reasonably indicate a
consumer’s attempt to acquire or receive reproductive or sexual health
services;
(ii) efforts to research or obtain reproductive or sexual health
services; or
(iii) any reproductive or sexual health information that is derived,
extrapolated, or inferred, including from nonhealth information, such as proxy,
derivative, inferred, emergent, or algorithmic data.
(26) “Reproductive or sexual health services” means health services or
products that support or relate to a consumer’s reproductive system or sexual
well-being, including:
(A) individual health conditions, status, diseases, or diagnoses;
(B) social, psychological, behavioral, and medical interventions;
(C) health-related surgeries or procedures, including abortions;
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 13 of 30
(D) use or purchase of medication, including medications for the
purposes of abortion;
(E) bodily functions, vital signs, symptoms, or measurements of the
information described in this subdivision (26);
(F) diagnoses or diagnostic testing, treatment, or medication;
(G) medical or nonmedical services related to and provided in
conjunction with an abortion, including associated diagnostics, counseling,
supplies, and follow-up services; and
(H) any other services included in the definition of “reproductive
health care services” in 1 V.S.A. § 150.
(27)(A) “Sell” or “sale” means the exchange of consumer health data for
monetary or other valuable consideration.
(B) “Sell” or “sale” does not include the exchange of consumer
health data for monetary or other valuable consideration:
(i) to a third party as an asset that is part of a merger, acquisition,
bankruptcy, or other transaction in which the third party assumes control of all
or part of the regulated entity’s or the small business’s assets and complies
with the requirements and obligations in this chapter; or
(ii) by a regulated entity or a small business to a processor when
such exchange is consistent with the purpose for which the consumer health
data was collected and the exchange was disclosed to the consumer.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 14 of 30
(28)(A) “Share” or “sharing” means to release, disclose, disseminate,
divulge, make available, provide access to, license, or otherwise communicate
orally, in writing, or by electronic or other means consumer health data by a
regulated entity or a small business to a third party or affiliate.
(B) The term “share” or “sharing” does not include:
(i) the disclosure of consumer health data by a regulated entity or
a small business to a processor when the sharing is to provide goods or
services in a manner consistent with the purpose for which the consumer health
data was collected and the exchange was disclosed to the consumer;
(ii) the disclosure of consumer health data to a third party with
whom the consumer has a direct relationship when:
(I) the disclosure is for purposes of providing a product or
service requested by the consumer;
(II) the regulated entity or the small business maintains control
and ownership of the data; and
(III) the third party uses the consumer health data only at the
direction of the regulated entity or the small business and consistent with the
purpose for which it was collected and consented to by the consumer; or
(iii) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to a third party as an
asset that is part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other transaction in
which the third party assumes control of all or part of the regulated entity’s or
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 15 of 30
the small business’s assets and complies with the requirements and obligations
in this chapter.
(29) “Small business” means a regulated entity that satisfies one or both
of the following thresholds:
(A) the entity collects, processes, sells, or shares the consumer health
data of fewer than 100,000 consumers during a calendar year; or
(B) the entity derives less than 50 percent of its gross revenue from
the collection, processing, selling, or sharing of consumer health data and the
entity controls, processes, sells, or shares consumer health data of fewer than
25,000 consumers.
(30) “Third party” means an entity other than a consumer, regulated
entity, processor, small business, or affiliate of the regulated entity or the small
business.
§ 1891d. CONSUMER HEALTH DATA PRIVACY POLICY REQUIRED
(a) Each regulated entity or each small business shall maintain a consumer
health data privacy policy that clearly and conspicuously discloses:
(1) the categories of consumer health data collected and the purpose for
which the data is collected, including how the data will be used;
(2) the categories of sources from which the consumer health data is
collected;
(3) the categories of consumer health data that is shared;
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 16 of 30
(4) a list of the categories of third parties and specific affiliates with
whom the regulated entity or small business shares the consumer health data;
and
(5) how a consumer can exercise the rights provided in section 1891f of
this chapter.
(b) A regulated entity or small business shall prominently publish a link to
its consumer health data privacy policy on its homepage.
(c) A regulated entity or small business shall not collect, use, or share
additional categories of consumer health data not disclosed in the consumer
health data privacy policy without first disclosing the additional categories and
obtaining the consumer’s affirmative consent prior to the collection, use, or
sharing of the consumer health data.
(d) A regulated entity or small business shall not collect, use, or share
consumer health data for additional purposes not disclosed in the consumer
health data privacy policy without first disclosing the additional purposes and
obtaining the consumer’s affirmative consent prior to the collection, use, or
sharing of the consumer health data.
(e) It is a violation of this subchapter for a regulated entity or small
business to contract with a processor to process consumer health data in a
manner that is inconsistent with the regulated entity’s or small business’s
consumer health data privacy policy.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 17 of 30
§ 1891e. COLLECTION AND SHARING OF CONSUMER HEALTH
DATA
(a) A regulated entity or small business shall not collect any consumer
health data except:
(1) with consent from the consumer for such collection for a specified
purpose; or
(2) to the extent necessary to provide a product or service that the
consumer to whom the consumer health data relates has requested from the
regulated entity or small business.
(b) A regulated entity or small business shall not share any consumer health
data except:
(1) with consent from the consumer for the sharing that is separate and
distinct from the consent obtained to collect consumer health data; or
(2) to the extent necessary to provide a product or service that the
consumer to whom the consumer health data relates has requested from the
regulated entity or small business.
(c) Consent required under this section shall be obtained prior to the
collection or sharing, as applicable, of any consumer health data, and the
request for consent must clearly and conspicuously disclose:
(1) the categories of consumer health data collected or shared;
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 18 of 30
(2) the purpose of the collection or sharing of the consumer health data,
including the specific ways in which it will be used;
(3) the categories of entities with whom the consumer health data is
shared; and
(4) how the consumer can withdraw consent from future collection or
sharing of the consumer’s health data.
(d) A regulated entity or small business shall not unlawfully discriminate
against a consumer for exercising any rights included in this chapter.
§ 1891f. CONSUMER RIGHTS
(a) Confirmation. A consumer has the right to confirm whether a regulated
entity or a small business is collecting, sharing, or selling consumer health data
regarding the consumer and to access that data, including a list of all third
parties and affiliates with whom the regulated entity or small business has
shared or sold the consumer’s health data and an active email address or other
online mechanism that the consumer may use to contact these third parties.
(b) Withdrawal of consent. A consumer has the right to withdraw consent
from a regulated entity’s or small business’s collection and sharing of
consumer health data regarding the consumer.
(c) Right to delete. A consumer has the right to have consumer health data
regarding the consumer deleted and may exercise that right by informing the
regulated entity or small business of the consumer’s request for deletion.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 19 of 30
(1) A regulated entity or small business that receives a consumer’s
request to delete any consumer health data regarding the consumer shall:
(A) delete the consumer health data from its records, including from
all parts of the regulated entity’s or small business’s network, including
archived or backup systems pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection (c);
and
(B) notify all affiliates, processors, contractors, and other third parties
with whom the regulated entity or the small business has shared consumer
health data of the deletion request.
(2) All affiliates, processors, contractors, and other third parties that
receive notice of a consumer’s deletion request shall honor the consumer’s
deletion request and delete the consumer health data from its records in
accordance with the requirements of this subchapter.
(3) If consumer health data that a consumer requests to be deleted is
stored on archived or backup systems, then the request for deletion may be
delayed to enable restoration of the archived or backup systems, provided that
the delay shall not exceed six months from the date of authentication of the
deletion request.
(d) Request requirements.
(1) A consumer may exercise the rights set forth in this chapter by
submitting a request to a regulated entity or small business at any time. The
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 20 of 30
request may be made by a secure and reliable means established by the
regulated entity or small business and described in its consumer health data
privacy policy. The method shall take into account the ways in which
consumers normally interact with the regulated entity or small business, the
need for secure and reliable communication of such requests, and the ability of
the regulated entity or the small business to authenticate the identity of the
consumer making the request. A regulated entity or small business shall not
require a consumer to create a new account in order to exercise consumer
rights pursuant to this subchapter but may require a consumer to use an
existing account.
(2) If a regulated entity or small business is unable to authenticate the
request using commercially reasonable efforts, the regulated entity or small
business is not required to comply with a request to initiate an action under this
section and may request that the consumer provide additional information
reasonably necessary to authenticate the consumer and the consumer’s request.
(3) Information provided in response to a consumer request shall be
provided by a regulated entity or small business free of charge, up to twice
annually per consumer. If requests from a consumer are manifestly unfounded,
excessive, or repetitive, the regulated entity or small business may charge the
consumer a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of complying with
the request or decline to act on the request. The regulated entity or small
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 21 of 30
business bears the burden of demonstrating the manifestly unfounded,
excessive, or repetitive nature of the request.
(4) A regulated entity or small business shall comply with a consumer’s
requests under subsections (a) through (c) of this section without undue delay,
but in all cases within 45 days following receipt of the request submitted
pursuant to the methods described in this section. A regulated entity or small
business shall promptly take steps to authenticate a consumer request;
provided, however, that completion of these steps does not extend the
regulated entity’s or small business’s duty to comply with the consumer’s
request within 45 days following receipt of the consumer’s request. The
response period may be extended once by 45 additional days when reasonably
necessary, taking into account the complexity and number of the consumer’s
requests, provided the regulated entity or small business informs the consumer
of any such extension within the initial 45-day response period, together with
the reason for the extension.
(e) Consumer appeal. A regulated entity or small business shall establish a
process for a consumer to appeal the regulated entity’s or small business’s
refusal to take action on a request within a reasonable period of time after the
consumer’s receipt of the decision. The appeal process shall be conspicuously
available and similar to the process for submitting requests to initiate action
pursuant to this section. Within 45 days following receipt of an appeal, a
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 22 of 30
regulated entity or small business shall inform the consumer in writing of any
action taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written
explanation of the reasons for the decisions. If the appeal is denied, the
regulated entity or small business shall also provide the consumer with an
online mechanism, if available, or other method through which the consumer
may contact the Office of the Attorney General to submit a complaint.
§ 1891g. PROTECTION OF CONSUMER HEALTH DATA
A regulated entity or small business shall:
(1) restrict access to consumer health data by the regulated entity’s or
small business’s employees, processors, and contractors to only those
employees, processors, and contractors for whom access is necessary to further
the purposes for which the consumer provided consent or where necessary to
provide a product or service that the consumer to whom such consumer health
data relates has requested from the regulated entity or small business; and
(2) establish, implement, and maintain administrative, technical, and
physical data security practices that, at a minimum, satisfy reasonable
standards of care within the regulated entity’s or small business’s industry to
protect the confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility of consumer health data
appropriate to the volume and nature of the consumer health data at issue.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 23 of 30
§ 1891h. PROCESSORS OF CONSUMER HEALTH DATA
(a) Contract required.
(1) A processor may process consumer health data only pursuant to a
binding contract between the processor and the regulated entity or small
business that sets forth the processing instructions and limits the actions the
processor may take with respect to the consumer health data it processes on
behalf of the regulated entity or small business.
(2) A processor may process consumer health data only in a manner that
is consistent with the binding instructions set forth in the contract with the
regulated entity or small business.
(b) Obligation to assist. To the extent possible, a processor shall use
appropriate technical and organizational measures to assist the regulated entity
or small business in fulfilling the regulated entity’s and the small business’s
obligations under this chapter.
(c) Failure to adhere. If a processor fails to adhere to the regulated entity’s
or small business’s instructions or processes consumer health data in a manner
that is outside the scope of the processor’s contract with the regulated entity or
small business, the processor is considered a regulated entity or small business
with respect to the data and is subject to all the requirements of this chapter
with regard to the data.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 24 of 30
§ 1891i. LIMITATIONS ON SALE OF CONSUMER HEALTH DATA
(a) Authorization required. It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer to
sell consumer health data regarding a consumer without first obtaining valid
authorization from the consumer. The sale of consumer health data must be
consistent with the valid authorization signed by the consumer. This
authorization shall be separate and distinct from the consent obtained to collect
or share consumer health data, as required under section 1891e of this chapter.
(b) Requirements of a valid authorization. A valid authorization to sell
consumer health data shall be a document that is consistent with this section
and is written in plain language. A valid authorization to sell consumer health
data shall contain all of the following:
(1) the specific consumer health data regarding the consumer that the
person intends to sell;
(2) the name and contact information of the person collecting and selling
the consumer health data;
(3) the name and contact information of the person purchasing the
consumer health data from the seller identified in subdivision (2) of this
subsection;
(4) a description of the purpose for the sale, including how the consumer
health data will be gathered and how it will be used by the purchaser identified
in subdivision (3) of this subsection when sold;
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 25 of 30
(5) a statement that the provision of goods or services shall not be
conditioned on the consumer signing the valid authorization;
(6) a statement that the consumer has a right to revoke the valid
authorization at any time and a description of how to submit a revocation of
the valid authorization;
(7) a statement that the consumer health data sold pursuant to the valid
authorization may be subject to redisclosure by the purchaser and may no
longer be protected by this section;
(8) an expiration date for the valid authorization that expires one year
after the consumer signs the valid authorization; and
(9) the signature of the consumer and date.
(c) Invalid authorizations. An authorization is not valid if the document
has any of the following defects:
(1) the expiration date has passed;
(2) the authorization does not contain all of the information required
under this section;
(3) the authorization has been revoked by the consumer;
(4) the authorization has been combined with other documents to create
a compound authorization; or
(5) the provision of goods or services is conditioned on the consumer
signing the authorization.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 26 of 30
(d) Copies and retention.
(1) A copy of the signed valid authorization shall be provided to the
consumer.
(2) A seller or purchaser of consumer health data shall retain a copy of
each valid authorization for the sale of consumer health data for six years from
the date of its signature or the date when it was last in effect, whichever is
later.
§ 1891j. GEOFENCES PROHIBITED
It is unlawful for any person to implement a geofence to establish a virtual
boundary that is within 1,850 feet of any health care facility, including any
mental health facility or reproductive or sexual health facility, for the purpose
of identifying, tracking, collecting data from, or sending any notification to a
consumer regarding the consumer’s consumer health data.
§ 1891k. VIOLATIONS; ENFORCEMENT
(a) A violation of this subchapter shall be deemed a violation of the
Consumer Protection Act, 9 V.S.A. chapter 63. The Attorney General has the
same authority to make rules, conduct civil investigations, enter into
assurances of discontinuance, and bring civil actions, and private parties have
the same rights and remedies, as provided under 9 V.S.A. chapter 63,
subchapter 1.
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 27 of 30
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude or supplant any
other statutory or common law remedies.
§ 1891l. EXEMPTIONS
(a) This subchapter shall not apply to:
(1) information that meets the definition of:
(A) protected health information for purposes of the federal Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and related regulations;
(B) patient-identifying information collected, used, or disclosed in
accordance with 42 C.F.R. Part 2, established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 290dd-2;
or
(C) identifiable private information for purposes of the federal policy
for the protection of human subjects, 45 C.F.R. Part 46; identifiable private
information that is otherwise information collected as part of human subjects
research pursuant to the Good Clinical Practice Guidelines issued by the
International Council for Harmonization; the protection of human subjects
under 21 C.F.R. Parts 50 and 56; or personal data used or shared in research
conducted in accordance with one or more of the requirements set forth in this
subsection (a);
(2) information and documents created specifically for, and collected
and maintained as part of, the patient safety surveillance and improvement
system established pursuant to chapter 43A of this title;
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 28 of 30
(3) information and documents created for purposes of the federal
Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1986, and related regulations;
(4) patient safety work product for purposes of 42 C.F.R. Part 3,
established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §§ 299b-21–299b-26;
(5) information that is deidentified in accordance with the requirements
for deidentification set forth in 45 C.F.R. Part 164;
(6) information originating from, and intermingled so as to be
indistinguishable with, information described under subdivisions (1)–(5) of
this subsection that is maintained by:
(A) a covered entity that is not a hybrid entity, any health care
component of a hybrid entity, or a business associate as those terms are defined
by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and related
regulations;
(B) a health care facility or health care provider, as defined in section
9402 of this title; or
(C) a program or a qualified service organization as defined by 42
C.F.R. Part 2, established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 290dd-2;
(7) information used only for public health activities and purposes as
described in 45 C.F.R. § 164.512 or that is part of a limited data set, as defined,
and is used, disclosed, and maintained in the manner required, by 45 C.F.R.
§ 164.514; or
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 29 of 30
(8) an area agency on aging.
(b) Personal information that is governed by and collected, used, or
disclosed pursuant to the following regulations, parts, titles, or acts is exempt
from this subchapter:
(1) the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C. § 6801 et seq. and
implementing regulations;
(2) part C of Title XI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1320d et
seq.;
(3) the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq.;
(4) the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g
and 34 C.F.R. Part 99; and
(5) the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange, 33 V.S.A. chapter 18,
subchapter 1, and related federal laws and Vermont rules, including 45 C.F.R.
§ 155.260.
(c) The obligations imposed on regulated entities, small businesses, and
processors under this subchapter shall not be construed to restrict a regulated
entity’s, small business’s, or processor’s ability to collect, use, or disclose
consumer health data to prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to security
incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious or deceptive activities, or
any activity that is illegal under Vermont or federal law; preserve the integrity
VT LEG #379087 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.74
2025 Page 30 of 30
or security of systems; or investigate, report, or prosecute those responsible for
any such action that is illegal under Vermont or federal law.
(d) If a regulated entity, small business, or processor processes consumer
health data pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, that entity shall bear the
burden of demonstrating that the processing qualifies for the exemption and
complies with the requirements of this section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #379087 v.1